Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.080

Purchase of property from federal government authorized—Inconsistent provisions suspended.

Any provisions of any law, charter, ordinance, resolution, bylaw, rule or regulation which are inconsistent with the provisions of RCW 39.32.070 and 39.32.080 are suspended to the extent such provisions are inconsistent herewith.

[ 1945 c 180 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-51.]